Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-10] Renewal of license.
Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall be valid for three years and
shall be renewed upon the payment of a renewal fee within sixty days before the
expiration of the license. Failure to renew a license shall result in
forfeiture of that license. Licenses that have been forfeited may be
restored within one year of the forfeiture date upon payment of renewal and
restoration fees. Failure to restore a forfeited license within one year
shall result in the automatic termination of the license. A person whose
license has been terminated pursuant to this section shall be required to
reapply for a new license as a new applicant. [L 2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next